District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.17

Appeals.

Appeals of any order or fine made by the Ethics Board in accordance with this subchapter shall be made to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 217, 59 DCR 1862